Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 21 Rhode Island Commercial Receivership Act
10-21-20.
Notice of appointment — Claim against receivership — Distribution to creditors.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, a receiver shall give notice of appointment of the receiver to creditors of the owner by:

Deposit for delivery through first-class mail or other commercially reasonable delivery method to the last known address of each creditor; and

Publication as directed by the court.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, the notice required by subsection (a) of this section must specify the date by which each creditor holding a claim against the owner which arose before appointment of the receiver must submit the claim to the receiver. The date specified must be at least four (4) months after the later of notice under subsection (a)(1) of this section or last publication under subsection (a)(2) of this section. The court may extend the period for submitting the claim. Unless the court orders otherwise, a claim that is not submitted timely is not entitled to a distribution from the receivership.

A claim submitted by a creditor under this section must:

State the name and address of the creditor;

State the amount and basis of the claim;

Identify any property securing the claim;

Be signed by the creditor under penalty of perjury; and

Include a copy of any record on which the claim is based.

An assignment by a creditor of a claim against the owner is effective against the receiver only if the assignee gives timely notice of the assignment to the receiver in a signed record.

At any time before entry of an order approving a receiver’s final report, the receiver may file with the court an objection to a claim of a creditor, stating the basis for the objection. The court shall allow or disallow the claim according to law of this state other than this chapter.

If the court concludes that receivership property is likely to be insufficient to satisfy claims of each creditor holding a perfected lien on the property, the court may order that:

The receiver need not give notice under subsection (a) of this section of the appointment to all creditors of the owner, but only such creditors as the court directs; and

Unsecured creditors need not submit claims under this section.

Subject to §

10-21-21

:

A distribution of receivership property to a creditor holding a perfected lien on the property must be made in accordance with the creditor’s priority under law of this state other than this chapter; and

A distribution of receivership property to a creditor with an allowed unsecured claim must be made as the court directs according to law of this state other than this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-21.
Fees and expenses.

The court may award a receiver from receivership property the reasonable and necessary fees and expenses of performing the duties of the receiver and exercising the powers of the receiver.

The court may order one or more of the following to pay the reasonable and necessary fees and expenses of the receivership, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs:

A person that requested the appointment of the receiver, if the receivership does not produce sufficient funds to pay the fees and expenses; or

A person whose conduct justified or would have justified the appointment of the receiver under §

10-21-6(a)(1)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-21.1.
Emergency declaration receivership program coordinator.

The presiding justice of the superior court may appoint an individual to serve as program coordinator to identify and coordinate sources for funding, legal services, accounting services, and other appropriate services for temporary non-liquidating receiverships. The individual must have appropriate qualifications for the position and shall serve at the pleasure of the presiding justice. The program coordinator is not a judicial officer, but may be sued personally for an act or omission in performing his or her duties only with the approval of the presiding justice. On application to the presiding justice after notice and opportunity for hearing, the program coordinator may be awarded reasonable compensation through an equitable charge on receivership property in temporary non-liquidating receiverships.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-22.
Removal of receiver — Replacement — Termination of receivership.

The court may remove a receiver for cause.

The court shall replace a receiver that dies, resigns, or is removed.

If the court finds that a receiver that resigns or is removed, or the representative of a receiver that is deceased, has accounted fully for and turned over to the successor receiver all receivership property and has filed a report of all receipts and disbursements during the service of the replaced receiver, the replaced receiver is discharged.

The court may discharge a receiver and terminate the court’s administration of the receivership property if the court finds that appointment of the receiver was improvident or that the circumstances no longer warrant continuation of the receivership. If the court finds that the appointment was sought wrongfully or in bad faith, the court may assess against the person that sought the appointment:

The fees and expenses of the receivership, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs; and

Actual damages caused by the appointment, including reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-23.
Final report of receiver — Discharge.

On completion of a receiver’s duties, the receiver shall file a final report including:

A description of the activities of the receiver in the conduct of the receivership;

A list of receivership property at the commencement of the receivership and any receivership property received during the receivership;

A list of disbursements, including payments to professionals engaged by the receiver;

A list of dispositions of receivership property;

A list of distributions made or proposed to be made from the receivership for creditor claims;

If not filed separately, a request for approval of the payment of fees and expenses of the receiver; and

Any other information required by the court.

If the court approves a final report filed under subsection (a) of this section and the receiver distributes all receivership property, the receiver is discharged.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-24.
Receivership in another state — Ancillary proceeding.

The court may appoint a receiver appointed in another state, or that person’s nominee, as an ancillary receiver with respect to property located in this state or subject to the jurisdiction of the court for which a receiver could be appointed under this chapter, if:

The person or nominee would be eligible to serve as receiver under this chapter; and

The appointment furthers the person’s possession, custody, control, or disposition of property subject to the receivership in the other state.

The court may issue an order that gives effect to an order entered in another state appointing or directing a receiver.

Unless the court orders otherwise, an ancillary receiver appointed under subsection (a) of this section has the rights, powers, and duties of a receiver appointed under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-25.
Effect of enforcement by secured party.

A request by a secured party for appointment of a receiver, the appointment of a receiver, or application by a secured party of receivership property or proceeds to the secured obligation does not:

Make the secured party a mortgagee in possession of the real property;

Impose any duty on the secured party under §

6A-9-207

;

Make the secured party an agent of the owner;

Constitute an election of remedies that precludes a later action to enforce the secured obligation;

Make the secured obligation unenforceable; or

Limit any right available to the secured party with respect to the secured obligation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-26.
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-27.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede § 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c)), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in § 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b)).

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-28.
Transition.

This chapter does not apply to a receivership for which the receiver was appointed before June 20, 2022.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-28.1.
Emergency declaration temporary non-liquidating receivership transition provisions.

Notwithstanding §

10-21-28

, the court may for cause apply this chapter to a receivership for which a receiver was appointed before June 20, 2022, if the owner would otherwise be eligible for a temporary non-liquidating receivership.

Unless extended by the general assembly, the emergency declaration provisions apply only to a receivership in which the court first appoints a receiver:

If because of the COVID-19 pandemic, during the period beginning on the effective date of this chapter [June 20, 2022] and ending on June 30, 2022; or

If because of any other emergency, during the period beginning on the date the emergency declaration is issued and ending ninety (90) days after the end of the emergency.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.

10-21-29.
Official comments.

It is the intention of the general assembly that the official comments to the Uniform Commercial Real Estate Receivership Act as approved and recommended for enactment in all the States by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws in 2015 represent the express legislative intent of the general assembly and shall be used as a guide for interpretation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 107, § 1, effective June 20, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 20, 2022.